Hawaii statutes.
[§463E-9] Recalcitrant witnesses; contempt.
If any person called before the board as a witness in any proceeding involving
the revocation or suspension of a license, whether under subpoena or otherwise,
except as privileged by law, refuses to answer any question which is relevant
to the proceeding and is put to the person by the board, a member of the board,
or the person whose license is sought to be revoked or suspended in the
proceeding, or disobeys any order of the circuit court relating to the proceeding,
the board shall report the matter in writing to any judge of the circuit court
of the circuit in which the proceeding is held and the person shall be cited to
appear before the circuit judge to show cause why the person should not be
punished for contempt of court. [L 1973, c 80, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next